Ohio, session 136, SB364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.974 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.974. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, that portion of United States route number three hundred twenty-two, running in an easterly and westerly direction, between east fortieth street and east eighty-first street, within the municipal corporation of Cleveland in Cuyahoga county, shall be known as the "Cleveland Police Officer Jamieson Ritter Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.